task.twol
Alphabet
  b d ə ɦ i k l m r ṛ ʃ t w x ʒ
  %{d%};

Rules

"удваиваем m"

%{d%}:m <=> m _;

"удваиваем w"

%{d%}:w <=> w _;

"удваиваем t"

%{d%}:t <=> t _ ə;

"удваиваем ṛ"

%{d%}:ṛ <=> ṛ _ ə;

"удваиваем r"

%{d%}:r <=> r _ ə;

"удваиваем x"

%{d%}:x <=> x _ ə;

"удаляем ə"

ə:0 <=> _ i;
